Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
E. Indemnification

§ 17-16-850.
Subarticle definitions.

In this subarticle:

“Corporation” includes any domestic or foreign predecessor entity of a corporation in a merger;

“Director” or “officer” means an individual who is or was a director or officer, respectively, of a corporation or who, while a director or officer of the corporation, is or was serving at the corporation’s request as a director, officer, manager, partner, trustee, employee or agent of another entity or employee benefit plan. A director or officer is considered to be serving an employee benefit plan at the corporation’s request if the individual’s duties to the corporation also impose duties on, or otherwise involve services by, the individual to the plan or to participants in or beneficiaries of the plan. “Director” or “officer” includes, unless the context requires otherwise, the estate or personal representative of a director or officer;

“Liability” means the obligation to pay a judgment, settlement, penalty, fine (including an excise tax assessed with respect to an employee benefit plan), or reasonable expenses incurred with respect to a proceeding.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 1997, ch. 190, § 2; 2009, ch. 115, §§ 2, 3.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in the first sentence of (a), added “manager,” and substituted “entity or employee benefit plan” for “domestic or foreign corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, employee benefit plan or other entity”; substituted “the individual's” or variant for “his” or variant wherever it appears in the second sentence of (a); and deleted former (a)(iii), (iv), (vi) and (vii), which read: “(iii) ‘Disinterested director’ means a director who, at the time of a vote referred to in W.S. 17-16-853(c) or a vote or selection referred to in W.S. 17-16-855(b) or (c), is not:

“(A) A party to the proceeding; or

“(B) An individual having a familial, financial, professional or employment relationship with the director whose indemnification or advance for expenses is the subject of the decision being made, which relationship would, in the circumstances, reasonably be expected to exert an influence on the director's judgment when voting on the decision being made.

“(iv) ‘Expenses’ includes counsel fees;

“(vi) ‘Party’ means an individual who was, is or is threatened to be made, a defendant or respondent in a proceeding;

“(vii) ‘Proceeding’ means any threatened, pending or completed action, suit or proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, arbitrative or investigative and whether formal or informal.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

The paragraphs in this section have been renumbered to more closely align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.
The two do not align completely as the numbering system of the Model Act is different from Wyoming Statutes under W.S.

8-1-105

, which is required by the 2009 law to be followed in the renumbering process.

§ 17-16-851.
Permissible indemnification.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a corporation may indemnify an individual who is a party to a proceeding because the individual is a director against liability incurred in the proceeding if:

The director conducted himself in good faith; and
(i) (A) The director conducted himself in good faith; and

He reasonably believed that his conduct was in or at least not opposed to the corporation’s best interests; and

In the case of any criminal proceeding, the director had no reasonable cause to believe his conduct was unlawful; or

The director engaged in conduct for which broader indemnification has been made permissible or obligatory under a provision of the articles of incorporation, as authorized by W.S. 17-16-202(b)(v).

A director’s conduct with respect to an employee benefit plan for a purpose the director reasonably believed to be in the interests of the participants in and beneficiaries of the plan is conduct that satisfies the requirement of subparagraph (a)(i)(B) of this section.

The termination of a proceeding by judgment, order, settlement, conviction, or upon a plea of nolo contendere or its equivalent is not, of itself, determinative that the director did not meet the standard of conduct described in this section.

Unless ordered by a court under W.S. 17-16-854(a)(iii) a corporation may not indemnify a director under this section:

In connection with a proceeding by or in the right of the corporation, except for reasonable expenses incurred in connection with the proceeding if it is determined that the director has met the standard of conduct under subsection (a) of this section; or

In connection with any proceeding with respect to conduct for which he was adjudged liable on the basis that he received a financial benefit to which he was not entitled, whether or not involving action in the director’s capacity.

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 190, § 3.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 1997, ch. 190, §§ 2, 3; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “the individual” for “he” in the introductory language of (a); substituted “the director” or variant for “he” or variant wherever it appears in (a) and (b); and added “whether or not involving action in the director's capacity” in (d)(ii).

Editor's notes. —

The subsections in this section have been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

§ 17-16-852.
Mandatory indemnification.

A corporation shall indemnify a director who was wholly successful, on the merits or otherwise, in the defense of any proceeding to which the director was a party because he was a director of the corporation against reasonable expenses incurred by the director in connection with the proceeding.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 1997, ch. 190, § 2; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted
“the director” for “he” wherever it appears.

§ 17-16-853.
Advance for expenses.

A corporation may, before final disposition of a proceeding, advance funds to pay for or reimburse the expenses incurred in connection with the proceeding by an individual who is a party to a proceeding because that individual is a member of the board of directors if he delivers to the corporation:

A written affirmation of his good faith belief that the standard of conduct described in W.S.

17-16-851

has been met by the director or that the proceeding involves conduct for which liability has been eliminated under a provision of the articles of incorporation as authorized by W.S. 17-16-202(b)(iv); and

His written undertaking to repay any funds advanced if the director is not entitled to mandatory indemnification under W.S.

17-16-852

and it is ultimately determined under W.S.

17-16-854

or

17-16-855

that he has not met the standard of conduct described in W.S.

17-16-851

.

Repealed by Laws 1997, ch. 190, § 3.

The undertaking required by paragraph (a)(ii) of this section shall be an unlimited general obligation of the director but need not be secured and may be accepted without reference to the financial ability of the director to make repayment.

Authorizations under this section shall be made:

By the board of directors:

If there are two (2) or more qualified directors, by a majority vote of all the qualified directors (a majority of whom shall for such purpose constitute a quorum) or by a majority of the members of a committee of two (2) or more qualified directors appointed by such a vote; or

If there are fewer than two (2) qualified directors, by the vote necessary for action by the board in accordance with W.S. 17-16-824(c), in which authorization directors who are not qualified directors may participate; or

By the shareholders, but shares owned by or voted under the control of a director who at the time is not a qualified director may not be voted on the authorization.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 1997, ch. 190, §§ 2, 3; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted
“expenses incurred in connection with the proceeding by an individual who is a party to a proceeding because that individual is a member of the board of directors” for “reasonable expenses incurred by a director who is a party to a proceeding because he is a director” in the introductory language of (a); in (a)(i), deleted “he has met” after “belief that”, and added “has been met by the director”; in (a)(ii), substituted “the director” for “he,” and added “under W.S.

17-16-854

or

17-16-855

”; substituted “qualified” for “disinterested” wherever it appears in (c)(i)(A) and the first time it appears in (c)(i)(B); and substituted “are not qualified” or variant for “do not qualify as disinterested” or variant in (c)(i)(B) and (c)(ii).

§ 17-16-854.
Court-ordered indemnification and advance for expenses.

A director who is a party to a proceeding because he is a director may apply for indemnification or an advance for expenses to the court conducting the proceeding or to another court of competent jurisdiction. After receipt of an application and after giving any notice it considers necessary, the court shall:

Order indemnification if the court determines that the director is entitled to mandatory indemnification under W.S.

17-16-852

;

Order indemnification or advance for expenses if the court determines that the director is entitled to indemnification or advance for expenses pursuant to a provision authorized by W.S. 17-16-858(a); or

Order indemnification or advance for expenses if the court determines, in view of all the relevant circumstances, that it is fair and reasonable:

To indemnify the director; or

To advance expenses to the director, even if he has not met the standard of conduct set forth in W.S. 17-16-851(a), failed to comply with W.S.

17-16-853

or was adjudged liable in a proceeding referred to in W.S. 17-16-851(d)(i) or (ii), but if the director was adjudged so liable his indemnification shall be limited to expenses incurred in connection with the proceeding.

If the court determines that the director is entitled to indemnification under paragraph (a)(i) of this section or to indemnification or advance for expenses under paragraph (a)(ii) of this section, it shall also order the corporation to pay the director’s expenses incurred in connection with obtaining court-ordered indemnification or advance for expenses. If the court determines that the director is entitled to indemnification or advance for expenses under paragraph (a)(iii) of this section, it may also order the corporation to pay the director’s expenses to obtain court-ordered indemnification or advance for expenses.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 1997, ch. 190, § 2; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, in (a)(iii)(B), substituted “the director” for “he” after “but if”, and deleted “reasonable” after “limited to”; and deleted “reasonable” after “the director's” wherever it appears in (b).

§ 17-16-855.
Determination and authorization of indemnification.

A corporation may not indemnify a director under W.S.

17-16-851

unless authorized for a specific proceeding after a determination has been made that indemnification of the director is permissible because the director has met the standard of conduct set forth in W.S.

17-16-851

.

The determination shall be made:

If there are two (2) or more qualified directors, by the board of directors by majority vote of all the qualified directors (a majority of whom shall for such purpose constitute a quorum), or by a majority of the members of a committee of two (2) or more qualified directors appointed by such a vote;

By special legal counsel:

Selected in the manner prescribed in paragraph (i) of this subsection; or

If there are fewer than two (2) qualified directors, selected by the board of directors (in which selection directors who are not qualified directors may participate); or

By the shareholders, but shares owned by or voted under the control of a director who at the time is not a qualified director may not be voted on the determination.

Authorization of indemnification shall be made in the same manner as the determination that indemnification is permissible, except that if there are fewer than two (2) qualified directors, authorization of indemnification shall be made by those entitled under paragraph (b)(ii) of this section to select special legal counsel.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 1997, ch. 190, §§ 2, 3; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “the director” for “he,” in (a); substituted “qualified” for “disinterested” wherever it appears in (b)(i), the first time it appears in (b)(iii)(B), and in (c); and substituted “are not qualified” or variant for “do not qualify as disinterested” or variant in (b)(ii)(B) and (b)(iii).

Editor's notes. —

The subsections in this section have been renumbered to align with the Model Business Corporations Act as amended through December, 2007, in accordance with 2009 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 115, § 4.

§ 17-16-856.
Indemnification of officers.

A corporation may indemnify and advance expenses under this subarticle to an officer of the corporation who is a party to a proceeding because he is an officer of the corporation:

To the same extent as a director; and

If he is an officer but not a director, to such further extent as may be provided by the articles of incorporation, the bylaws, a resolution of the board of directors or contract, except for:

Liability in connection with a proceeding by or in the right of the corporation other than for expenses incurred in connection with the proceeding; or

Liability arising out of conduct that constitutes:

Receipt by the officer of a financial benefit to which he is not entitled;

An intentional infliction of harm on the corporation or the shareholders; or

An intentional violation of criminal law.

A corporation may also indemnify and advance expenses to a current or former officer, employee or agent who is not a director to the extent, consistent with public policy, that may be provided by its articles of incorporation, bylaws, general or specific action of its board of directors or contract.

The provisions of paragraph (a)(ii) of this section shall apply to an officer who is also a director if the basis on which he is made a party to the proceeding is an act or omission solely as an officer.

An officer of a corporation who is not a director is entitled to mandatory indemnification under W.S.

17-16-852

, and may apply to a court under W.S.

17-16-854

for indemnification or an advance for expenses, in each case to the same extent to which a director may be entitled to indemnification or advance for expenses under those provisions.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 1997, ch. 190, § 2; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, deleted “reasonable” after “other than for” in (a)(ii)(A); and substituted “the officer” for “him” in (a)(ii)(B)(I).

§ 17-16-857.
Insurance.

A corporation may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of an individual who is a director or officer of the corporation, or who, while a director or officer of the corporation, serves at the corporation’s request as a director, officer, partner, trustee, employee or agent of another domestic or foreign corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust, employee benefit plan, or other entity, against liability asserted against or incurred by the individual in that capacity or arising from his status as a director or officer whether or not the corporation would have power to indemnify or advance expenses to the individual against the same liability under this subarticle.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 1997, ch. 190, § 2; 2009, ch. 115, § 2.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “the individual” for “him” wherever it appears.

§ 17-16-858.
Variation by corporate action; application of subarticle.

A corporation may, by a provision in its articles of incorporation or bylaws or in a resolution adopted or a contract approved by its board of directors or shareholders, obligate itself in advance of the act or omission giving rise to a proceeding to provide indemnification in accordance with W.S.

17-16-851

or advance funds to pay for or reimburse expenses in accordance with W.S.

17-16-853

. Any such obligatory provision shall be deemed to satisfy the requirements for authorization referred to in W.S.

17-16-853

(c) and 17-16-855(c). Any provision that obligates the corporation to provide indemnification to the fullest extent permitted by law shall be deemed to obligate the corporation to advance funds to pay for or reimburse expenses in accordance with W.S. 17-16-853 to the fullest extent permitted by law, unless the provision specifically provides otherwise.

Any provision pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall not obligate the corporation to indemnify or advance expenses to a director of a predecessor of the corporation, pertaining to conduct with respect to the predecessor, unless otherwise specifically provided. Any provision for indemnification or advance for expenses in the articles of incorporation, bylaws, or a resolution of the board of directors or shareholders of a predecessor of the corporation in a merger or in a contract to which the predecessor is a party, existing at the time the merger takes effect, shall be governed by W.S. 17-16-1107(a)(iv).

A corporation may, by provision in its articles of incorporation, limit any of the rights to indemnification or advance for expenses created by or pursuant to this subarticle.

This subarticle does not limit a corporation’s power to pay or reimburse expenses incurred by a director or officer in connection with his appearance as a witness in a proceeding at a time when he is not a party.

This subarticle does not limit a corporation’s power to indemnify, advance expenses to or provide or maintain insurance on behalf of an employee or agent.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 249, § 1; 1997, ch. 190, § 2.

§ 17-16-859.
Exclusivity of subarticle.

A corporation may provide indemnification or advance expenses to a director or an officer only as permitted by this subarticle.

History.

Laws 1997, ch. 190, § 1.